Utah statutes.
31A-28-120.   Prospective application.
Notwithstanding any prior or subsequent law, the provisions of this part that
are in effect on the date on which the association first becomes obligated for
the policies or contracts of an insolvent or impaired member govern the
association's rights and obligations to the policyowners of the insolvent or
impaired member.
